Massachusetts, session 194th, H3249.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 6N the following section:-
Section 6O. (a) A qualifying employer that is not a business corporation subject to the
excise under chapter 63 shall be allowed a credit against the tax liability imposed by this chapter
equal to 100 per cent of the money it expended for the high school trade partnership program,
established in section 5C of chapter 74, in a taxable year, with a maximum credit of $100,000 per
qualifying employer in any 1 taxable year.
SECTION 2. Chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 31N the following section:-
of 3

Section 31O. (a) A qualifying business corporation engaged in business in the
commonwealth shall be allowed a credit against its excise due under this chapter in an amount
equal to 100 per cent of the money it expended for the high school trade partnership program,
established in section 5C of chapter 74, in a taxable year, with a maximum credit of $100,000 per
business corporation in any 1 taxable year.
SECTION 3. Chapter 74 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 5B the following section:-
Section 5C. (a) The department shall establish a high school trade partnership program to
allow public high schools to partner with local private employers for the purposes of providing
students with vocational-technical education and apprentice opportunities. The program shall
include academic and vocational credit for at school and on-site instruction and training.
(b)The department shall promulgate regulations to establish the minimum requirements
for the program, including: (i) criteria for participation by private employers; (ii) minimum
academic requirements for participating students; (iii) minimum onsite supervision and safety
standards; (iv) English language learner assistance, and (v) fulfillment of in-demand skills.
(c) A school committee may submit an application to the department of elementary and
secondary education for the participation of a public high school in the program.
(d) Each school district or municipality participating in the program shall appoint an
advisory committee, pursuant to section 6 of this chapter. The advisory committee shall evaluate
and approve applications for participation in the program submitted by students and private
employers.
of 3

SECTION 4. Section 10 of Chapter 70B of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding the following new subsection:
(d) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the authority shall be authorized and
directed to add twenty (20) percentage points to the project reimbursement rates for regional
vocational-technical high school and county, regional and independent agricultural high school
construction so that reimbursement rates for such projects are not less than 75% nor more than
90% of the eligible costs. Further, the authority shall add five (5) percentage points to the
reimbursement rate for any project that includes state-approved vocational-technical education
programs as defined in Chapter 74 of the General Laws aligned with priorities specifically
identified in the Regional Labor Market Blueprint for the region in which the school is located.
However, additional percentage points shall not be awarded unless the school currently offers
five (5) or more Chapter 74 programs. In no case shall the total reimbursement for a project
exceed 90% of eligible costs.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule to the contrary, the
office of administration and finance shall implement an incremental increase to the per-pupil
foundation rate for vocational and technical school students, equivalent to the inflation index.
of 3